District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-1303

Assault for refusal to accept challenge.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1328, ch. 854, § 853
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 2(g), 41 DCR 1639
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 3(e), 50 DCR 10996

History

1981 Ed., § 22-1103.
1973 Ed., § 22-1103.

Prior Codifications